Maryland, session 2025, HB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–104.1.
(A) If a bank, mortgage banker, savings and loan association, or any other lender
has an appraisal made on residential real property to establish a market value for lending
purposes, the lender shall give a copy of any written appraisal to the borrower on [his] THE
BORROWER’S request if the borrower pays the cost of the appraisal.
(B) The appraisal may be submitted to another lender if the original lender has
rejected the borrower’s loan application.
14–104.2.
(A) IF THE APPRAISAL OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY MADE UNDER §
14–104.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS LOWER THAN THE CURRENT MARKET VALUE OF THE
PROPERTY, THE SELLER MAY REQUEST THAT THE LENDER HAVE ONE ADDITIONAL
APPRAISAL MADE.
(A) (1) A SELLER OR THE SELLER’S AGENT MAY, AT ANY TIME DURING
THE SALE PROCESS, PROVIDE TO AN APPRAISER MAKING AN APPRAISAL UNDER §
14–104.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE INFORMATION OBTAINED BY THE SELLER RELATING TO
THE VALUE OF THE SELLER’S RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING
COMPARABLE SALES AND COST APPROACH INFORMATION.
(2) AN APPRAISER SHALL ACCEPT AND CONSIDER ANY INFORMATION
PROVIDED BY A SELLER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) IF AN APPRAISER CONCLUDES THE APPRAISAL VALUE OF
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IS LOWER THAN THE CONTRACT PRICE FOR THE SALE
OF THE PROPERTY, THE APPRAISER SHALL NOTIFY THE LENDER AND THE LENDER
SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER’S AGENT.
(2) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE FROM A LENDER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, A BUYER SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE SELLER, AND THE

HOUSE BILL 1151 3
BUYER AND THE SELLER SHALL HAVE 2 BUSINESS DAYS TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION ON THE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY TO THE LENDER FOR
SUBMISSION TO, AND RECONSIDERATION BY THE APPRAISER.
(3) AN APPRAISER WHO RECEIVES ADDITIONAL INFORMATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ALSO CONSIDER A
COST APPROACH AS PART OF A RECONSIDERATION OF THE APPRAISED VALUE.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY SEEKING TO REFINANCE A MORTGAGE OR ESTABLISH A HOME
EQUITY LINE OF CREDIT.
(2) IF THE APPRAISED VALUE OF RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE IS
LOWER THAN AN OWNER’S EXPECTED APPRAISAL VALUE, THE OWNER HAS THE
RIGHT TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION, INCLUDING COMPARABLE SALES
INFORMATION, TO A LENDER REGARDING THE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.
(3) THE LENDER SHALL PROVIDE THE NEW INFORMATION PROVIDED
BY THE OWNER TO THE APPRAISER FOR RECONSIDERATION.
(B) (D) A WRITTEN COPY OF AN ADDITIONAL APPRAISAL OR A
RECONSIDERATION MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED BY THE
LENDER TO THE SELLER AT NO COST TO THE SELLER REQUESTING PARTY AT NO
COST TO THE REQUESTING PARTY.
(E) ANY TRAINING OR CONTINUING EDUCATION FOR LICENSED
APPRAISERS IN THE STATE SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ON THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.